Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2090
Property and records; inspection by department.

The department may inspect the health care facility at any time during the receivership, and the receiver shall cooperate with the department in any such inspection. All records required by federal or state statutes and regulations shall be kept on the premises of the health care facility and shall be available for inspection and copying by any authorized employee of the department.

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 66.